apertium-olo-fin.olo.twol
!2013-04-29! [  #:  Cns* Vws (( r | i | VwsNonHigh ) k | t | h | l | r | s ) | Vws :Cns+ :Vws+ k ] _ [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %^WEAK:0 %>: ] ;
!2013-04-29!![ [ #: ] Cns* Vws (( r | i ) k | t | h | l | r | s ) | Vws :Cns+ :Vws+ k ] _ [ Vws: | :Vws | ( Vws ) %>: i ] ( %>: i: | %^StretchSyll2:0 ) %^WEAK:0 %>: ;
!2013-04-29!        [ #: ] Cns* VwsBack i: _ [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %^WEAK:0 %>: ] ;

!2013-04-29!! liika:liijan, reikä:reijän
!2013-04-29!"kToj"
!2013-04-29! k:j <=> [ #: ] Cns* [ VwsFront | VwsNeutral ] i: _ [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %^WEAK:0 %>: ] ;
!2013-04-29!
!2013-04-29!! mato : maot, ! mato : maool
!2013-04-29!! tToZero in weak
!2013-04-29!"Double stop:weakens tToZero"
!2013-04-29!t:0 <=> [ #: Cns* Vws | #: Cns* Vws [ Vws - [ i | u | y ] ] | Vws h [ y | u ] ] _  GRC ;
!2013-04-29!        [ #: Cns*  Vws+ [ h | (r) t ] | Vws ( %^WEAK:0 %>: ) t | Cns* Vws+ Cns+ Vws+ ( n ) t | Vws t ] _  [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %^WEAK:0 %>: ] ;
!2013-04-29!        t _ Vws l %^WGStem:0 ; ! ottel- to otel-

! luba : luvan
"b:v"
b:v <=> [ #: ] Cns* Vws ( r | l | Vws ) _ [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %^WEAK:0 %>: ] ;

!2013-04-29!"double pp to p"
!2013-04-29!p:0 <=> [ #: Cns* Vws ( m ) p | #: Cns* Vws Vws p | Cns* Vws+ Cns+ Vws+ p ] _ [ GRC | %^TS:0 i %^WEAK:0 %>: ] ;
"p:0 in lapsi"
p:0 <=> Vws _ s  %^KS2S:0  ;

!2013-04-29!!! Vowel raising
!2013-04-29!"o:u ö:y in Inf"
!2013-04-29! Vx:Vy <=> _ Vx: %>: v v A1: %^RVws:0 ;
!2013-04-29!           Vx: _ %>: v v A1: %^RVws:0 ;
!2013-04-29!          where Vx in (o ö)
!2013-04-29!                Vy in (u y) matched ;

!! Consonant loss
"d:0" !! pidiä:piän
d:0 <=> Vws _ Vws: %^WEAK:0  ;


!"Disallow V3 after two consecutive realized vowels"
! V3: /<= :Vws :0* :Vws :0* _ ;
